Vermont, session 2025-2026, H152.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 2811 is added to read:
§ 2811. PILOT OR DEMONSTRATION PROJECTS FOR EMERGING
CONTAMINANTS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Emerging contaminant” means:
(A) a hazardous material as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6602(16) or as
defined in rules adopted under 10 V.S.A. chapter 159;
(B) any constituent for which the Department of Health has
established a health advisory; or
(C) any constituent that the Secretary of Natural Resources
determines is an imminent and substantial endangerment to human health or
natural resources.
(2) “Pilot or demonstration project” means using prototype equipment or
processes on a temporary basis for the purpose of:
(A) collecting data necessary for the design of a full-scale process to
treat or destroy an emerging contaminant or contaminants;
(B) determining the feasibility of using the equipment or process to
treat or destroy an emerging contaminant or contaminants, while minimizing
VT LEG #380189 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.152
2025 Page 3 of 5
any discharges, emissions, or waste generated from the system to the extent
practicable.
(b) Authority. Notwithstanding the permit or permit amendment
requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapter 23, 47, 151, or 159, the Secretary of Natural
Resources may authorize a person to conduct a pilot or demonstration project
to treat or destroy an emerging contaminant or contaminants in accordance
with the requirements of this section.
(c) Application. An application for a pilot or demonstration project shall
be on a form prepared by the Secretary of Natural Resources. At a minimum,
the application shall:
(1) describe the treatment or destruction system proposed, including any
equipment design specifications or processes;
(2) describe all anticipated environmental impacts of the system’s
operation and any waste material that may be generated by the system;
(3) state the length of time requested for the pilot; and
(4) propose operations and monitoring that outline the operation of the
system and evaluate the effectiveness of the system to determine any unwanted
discharges, emissions, or wastes.
(d) Review and approvals.
VT LEG #380189 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.152
2025 Page 4 of 5
(1) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall review pilot and
demonstration projects under this section consistent with 10 V.S.A. § 7715
(Type 4 procedures).
(2) The Secretary of Natural Resources may require additional
monitoring or request additional information about the pilot or demonstration
project before approving a pilot or demonstration project.
(3) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall not approve a pilot or
demonstration project pursuant to this section if the operation of the system
creates an unreasonable risk to human health or the environment.
(4) The Secretary of Natural Resources may issue an authorization
under this section of a term not to exceed one year in duration.
(5) The holder of an authorization under this section shall provide the
Secretary of Natural Resources with a report within three months after the
conclusion of the pilot or demonstration that includes:
(A) monitoring data from the pilot period, and information on any
discharges, emissions, or waste generated from the system; and
(B) a conclusion on the effectiveness of the piloted treatment.
(6) The Secretary of Natural Resources may place any other condition
on an authorization issued under this section that is necessary to protect human
health or the environment.
VT LEG #380189 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.152
2025 Page 5 of 5
(7) The holder of the authorization issued under this section shall
suspend the pilot or demonstration project and notify the Secretary of Natural
Resources if the operation of the system results in environmental impacts
outside those anticipated under subdivision (c)(2) of this section. After review
of the environmental impacts, the Secretary may authorize the pilot or
demonstration to proceed or may terminate the pilot or demonstration project.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380189 v.1